Washington statutes.
RCW 43.46.015

Washington state arts commission established—Composition.

There is established a Washington state arts commission. The commission consists of nineteen members appointed by the governor and four members of the legislature, one from each caucus in the senate and appointed by the president of the senate and one from each caucus in the house of representatives and appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. The governor shall appoint citizens representing the various disciplines within the visual, performing and literary arts, and other citizens active in the arts community. The governor shall consider nominations for membership from individuals actively involved in cultural, state or community organizations. The governor shall also consider geographical distribution of the membership in the appointment of new members.

[ 1999 c 241 s 1; 1985 c 317 s 2.]